Washington statutes.
RCW 39.35.050

Life-cycle cost analysis—Guidelines.

The department, in consultation with affected public agencies, shall develop and issue guidelines for administering this chapter. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and method for performance of life-cycle cost analysis to promote the selection of low-life-cycle cost alternatives. At a minimum, the guidelines must contain provisions that:

(1) Address energy considerations during the planning phase of the project;

(2) Identify energy components and system alternatives including energy management systems, all-electric energy systems, renewable energy systems, and combined heat and power applications prior to commencing the energy consumption analysis;

(3) Identify simplified methods to assure the lowest life-cycle cost alternatives for selected buildings with between twenty-five thousand and one hundred thousand square feet of usable floor area;

(4) Establish times during the design process for preparation, review, and approval or disapproval of the life-cycle cost analysis;

(5) Specify the assumptions to be used for escalation and inflation rates, equipment service lives, economic building lives, and maintenance costs;

(6) Determine life-cycle cost analysis format and submittal requirements to meet the provisions of chapter 201, Laws of 1991;

(7) Provide for review and approval of life-cycle cost analysis.

[ 2022 c 178 s 4; 2001 c 214 s 17; 1996 c 186 s 403; 1994 c 242 s 3; 1991 c 201 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—2001 c 214: See notes following RCW 80.50.010.

Findings—2001 c 214: See note following RCW 39.35.010.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 186: See notes following RCW 43.330.904.